District of Columbia statutes.
32-1402

Apprenticeship Council; membership; term; compensation.

Without regard for any other provision of law with respect to the appointment of officers and employees of the United States or the District of Columbia, the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall appoint and the Council shall confirm an Apprenticeship Council, to be composed of 11 members, as follows: Three representatives from employer organizations, 3 representatives from employee organizations, and 3 public representatives, who are not members of either employee or employer organizations, chosen to make the Apprenticeship Council better reflect the composition of the District of Columbia labor force, including women and minorities who are traditionally under-represented in the trades, and 2 representatives of government, who shall be the Mayor of the District of Columbia and the Chancellor or their respective delegates. The terms of office of the members of the Apprenticeship Council first appointed by the Mayor shall expire as designated by the Mayor at the time of making the appointment: One representative each of employers, employees and the public being appointed for 1 year; 1 representative each of employers, employees and the public appointed for 2 years; and 1 representative each of employers, employees and the public for 3 years. Thereafter, each member shall be appointed for a term of 3 years. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term of his predecessor shall be appointed for the remainder of the term. At the end of a term, a member shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed and sworn into office.

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 204, ch. 267, § 2
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(ff), 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-156, § 2, 25 DCR 6991
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(b), 62 DCR 10905
Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Nomination and approval of agency heads, see § 1-523.01.
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01 and § 1-636.02.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Chancellor” for “Superintendent of Schools” in the first sentence; and rewrote the last sentence.
1981 Ed., § 36-402.
1973 Ed., § 36-122.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(b) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).